Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3606
Transition planning and services; agency implementation; funding.

(1) Each participating agency shall implement the Youth Reentry and Transitional Support Act within its existing duties, staff, and appropriations.

(2) The Department of Health and Human Services and Office of Juvenile Services shall integrate transition planning into its existing case management, child welfare, and medicaid resources to support services under the act.

(3) The Office of Probation Administration shall integrate transition planning into probation supervision and existing community-based programs.

(4) The State Department of Education shall deliver vocational rehabilitation and employment services through existing federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and pre-employment transition services funding or other existing federal funds.

(5) The Department of Labor may assist with workforce placement and apprenticeships using existing programs.

(6) Community-based organizations may partner with participating agencies through existing grants, contracts, or volunteer programs without additional state appropriations.

(7) No new General Fund appropriation is authorized under the Youth Reentry and Transitional Support Act. All participating agencies shall absorb any costs incurred using current appropriations or available federal, philanthropic, or reallocated funds.

Laws 2026, LB962, § 6.
December 1, 2026